Hawaii statutes.
§634-22 Return. [Repeal and
reenactment on June 30, 2020. L 2015, c 101, §4.] In all cases where any
process or order of a court is served by any officer of the court or of the
police force or the sheriff, deputy sheriff, an independent civil process server
from the department of public safety's list under section 353C-10, or any
investigator appointed and commissioned by the director of commerce and
consumer affairs pursuant to section 26-9(j), a record thereof shall be
endorsed upon the back of the process, complaint, order, or citation. The
record shall state the name of the person served and the time and place of
service and shall be signed by the sheriff, deputy sheriff, police officer,
independent civil process server, or investigator making the service. If the
sheriff, deputy sheriff, police officer, independent civil process server, or
investigator fails to make service, the sheriff, deputy sheriff, police
officer, independent civil process server, or investigator in like manner,
shall endorse the reason for the sheriff, deputy sheriff, police officer,
independent civil process server, or investigator's failure and sign this
record. When service is made by a person specially appointed by the court, or
an independent civil process server, that person shall make declaration or
affidavit of that service.

The record, declaration, or affidavit shall be
prima facie evidence of all it contains, and no further proof thereof shall be
required unless either party desires to examine the sheriff, deputy sheriff,
police officer, independent civil process server, or investigator making
service, in which case the sheriff, deputy sheriff, police officer, independent
civil process server, or investigator shall be notified to appear for
examination. [L 1888, c 57; RL 1925, §2342; RL 1935, §4078; RL 1945, §10060; RL
1955, §230-30; am L 1963, c 85, §3; HRS §634-58; am L 1972, c 89, §2A(e); ren
HRS §634-22; gen ch 1985; am L 1989, c 123, §3 and c 211, §10; am L 1990, c
281, §11; am L 1993, c 173, §3; am L 1994, c 9, §2; am L 2012, c 142, §8; am L
2013, c 116, §§10, 25(9)]

Rules of Court

As to circuit courts, see HRCP rule 4(g), (h); as to district
courts, see DCRCP rule 4(g), (h); as to family courts, see HFCR rule 4.

Probate proceedings, see HPR rule 8.

Case Notes

Officers who may serve. 15 H. 486 (1904).

Record sufficient evidence. 16 H. 427 (1905).

Return not invalidated by failure to show that it was made as
required by statute. Presumption of validity in absence of contrary showing.
19 H. 494 (1909).

Conflicting interests of serving officers. 40 H. 279 (1953).

Return is prima facie evidence of all it contains. 48 H.
306, 402 P.2d 440 (1965).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next